District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Energy Efficiency Financing Debt Cap Emergency Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 202(a) of the Energy Efficiency Financing Act of 2010, effective May 27,
2010 (D.C. Law 18-183; D.C. Official Code § 8-1778.22(a)), is amended by striking the phrase “of
bonds in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $250 million” and inserting the phrase “of
bonds” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2